Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 406.072 is amended to read:
406.072. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Uniformed service”  means the Armed Forces of the United States, the Army National Guard
or the Air National Guard  when the member is engaged in active duty for training, inactive duty
for training or full-time National Guard duty, the commissioned corps of the United States Public
Health Service and any other category of persons designated by the President  of the United States
in time of war or national emergency.
(b) “Written information”  means information that is in written form and includes but is not
limited to information obtained by electronic means, electronic mail, facsimile or  other form of
electronic communication.
(2)(a) Subject to subsection (3) of this section and  upon implementation or upgrade of an elec-
tronic delivery system that will enable the Department of  Human Services to provide the notice
required by this subsection in a cost-effective and efficient  manner, the Director of Human Services
shall notify the Director of Veterans’ Affairs within 30 days of receipt of written  information from
a member or veteran of a uniformed service who has applied  for benefits or services under the fol-
lowing:
(A) Temporary assistance for needy families program under ORS 412.001 to 412.069;
(B) Assistance funded under Title IV-A of the  Social Security Act as administered in this state
by the Department of Human Services;
(C) Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program under ORS 411.806 to 411.845;
(D) Oregon Health Plan;
(E) Programs and services for seniors and persons with disabilities administered by the Depart-
ment of Human Services; and
(F) Vocational rehabilitation  services and programs administered by the Department of Human
Services.
(b) Subject to subsection (3) of  this section, the Early Learning System Director shall notify the
Director of Veterans’ Affairs within 30 days  of receipt of written information from a member or
veteran of  a uniformed service who has applied for benefits or services under the Employment Re-
lated Day Care subsidy program administered by the Department of Early Learning and Care.
Enrolled House Bill 2341 (HB 2341-INTRO) Page 1
(c) The notification required under this subsection is limited to notifying the Director  of
Veterans’ Affairs of the name , [ and] residence [ address] or mailing address and electronic mail
address of the member or veteran.
(d) The authorization of a member or veteran as required  by subsection (3) of this section may
be contained in  the written information at the time it is received by the Department of Human
Services or the Department of Early Learning  and Care or separately at another time but the au-
thorization must specifically authorize the notification to be made under this subsection.
(3) The Director of Human Services or the Early Learning System  Director shall notify the Di-
rector of Veterans’ Affairs as  required by subsection (2) of this section only when authorized to do
so by the member or veteran of a uniformed service who submitted the written information.
(4) The Department of Human Services and the  Early Learning Council, in consultation with the
Department of Veterans’ Affairs, shall adopt rules to implement the provisions  of this section, in-
cluding but not limited to the method of notification required under subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 2.  ORS 406.073 is amended to read:
406.073. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Uniformed service”  means the Armed Forces of the United States, the Army National Guard
or the Air National Guard when the member is engaged in active duty  for training, inactive duty
for training or full-time National Guard duty, the commissioned corps of the United States Public
Health Service and any other  category of persons designated by the President of the United States
in time of war or national emergency.
(b) “Written information” means information that is in written form and includes but  is not
limited to information obtained by electronic means, such as electronic mail, facsimile or other  form
of electronic communication.
(2)(a) Subject to subsection (3) of this section,  the Director of Transportation shall notify the
Director of Veterans’ Affairs at least once a month regarding receipt of written information  from
a member or veteran  of a uniformed service when the Department of Transportation receives the
written information in connection with an application for:
(A) A license under ORS 807.050;
(B) An identification card under ORS 807.400;
(C) A certificate of title under ORS 803.050; or
(D) A vehicle registration under ORS 803.370.
(b) The notification  required under this subsection is limited to notifying the Director of
Veterans’ Affairs of the name , [ and] residence [ address] or  mailing address and electronic mail
address of the member or veteran.
(c) The authorization of a member or  veteran as required by subsection (3) of this section may
be contained in  the written information at the time it is received by the department or separately
at another time, but the authorization must specifically authorize the notification to  be made under
this section.
(3) The Director of Transportation shall notify the Director of Veterans’  Affairs as required by
subsection  (2)  of this section only if authorized to do so in writing by the member or veteran of a
uniformed service.
(4) The Department of Transportation, in consultation with the Department of Veterans’  Affairs,
shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section, including  but not limited to the method
of notification required under subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 414.044 is amended to read:
414.044. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Uniformed service”  means the Armed Forces of the United States, the Army National Guard
or the Air National Guard  when the member is engaged in active duty for training, inactive duty
for training or full-time National Guard duty, the commissioned corps of the United States Public
Health Service and any other category of persons designated by the President  of the United States
in time of war or national emergency.
Enrolled House Bill 2341 (HB 2341-INTRO) Page 2
(b) “Written information”  means information that is in written form and includes but is not
limited to information obtained by electronic means, such as electronic mail, facsimile or other  form
of electronic communication.
(2)(a) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, the  Director of the Oregon Health Authority shall
notify the Director of Veterans’  Affairs at least once each month regarding receipt of written in-
formation from a  member or veteran of a uniformed service in connection with an application for
health care coverage.
(b) The notification required under this subsection is limited to notifying the  Director of
Veterans’ Affairs of the name , [ and] residence [ address] or mailing address  and electronic mail
address of the member or veteran.
(c) The authorization of a member or veteran as required by  subsection (3) of this section may
be contained in the written information at the time it is received by the Oregon Health  Authority
or separately at another time, but the authorization  must specifically authorize the notification to
be made under this section.
(3) The Director of the Oregon Health Authority shall notify the Director  of Veterans’ Affairs
as required by subsection (2) of this section only if authorized to do so  in writing by the member
or veteran of a uniformed service.
(4) The  Oregon Health Authority, in consultation with the Department of Veterans’ Affairs, shall
adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section, including but not limited  to the method of
notification required under subsection (2) of this section.
Passed by House February 6, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2341 (HB 2341-INTRO) Page 3